Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Electric Cooperatives

279.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Acquire” means to construct, purchase, obtain by lease, devise, gift, or by eminent domain, or to obtain by any other lawful means;

“Board” means the board of directors of a corporation formed under this chapter;

“Business entity” means a domestic and foreign limited liability company, corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, and not-for-profit unincorporated association;

“Corporation” means a profit or nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of any state or a foreign country;

“Farm Credit Act” means Section 12 of the Federal Farm Credit Act of 1935 and the amendments thereto;

“Federal agency” means and includes the United States, the President of the United States, and all federal authorities, instrumentalities and agencies in the ordinary sense;

“Improve” means to construct, reconstruct, extend, enlarge, alter, better, or repair;

“Member” means and includes each person signing the articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under this chapter, each person later admitted to membership according to law or according to the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, and each common stockholder in a corporation organized under this chapter that has capital stock;

“Name of record with the Secretary of State” means any real, fictitious, reserved, registered, or assumed name of a business entity;

“Obligations” means and includes negotiable bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates or receipts and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued or the payment thereof assumed by a corporation organized under this chapter;

“Real name” shall have the meaning set forth in KRS

365.015

; and

“System” means and includes any plant, works, facilities, and properties, and all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, used or useful in the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electric energy.

History.

883j-2: amend. Acts 2007, ch. 137, § 131, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
131, effective July 15, 2010.

279.020.
Who may incorporate.

Any three (3) or more individuals, partnerships, associations, or private corporations a majority of whom are citizens of Kentucky, may by executing, filing, and recording articles of incorporation as provided in KRS

279.030

and

279.040

organize to conduct a nonprofit cooperative corporation for the:

Primary purpose of generating, purchasing, selling, transmitting, or distributing electric energy to any individual or entity, and providing any good or service related to generating, purchasing, selling, transmitting, or distributing electric energy to any individual or entity; and

If the cooperative desires, for the secondary purpose of engaging in any other lawful business or activity, provided that any nonregulated business or activity is conducted through an affiliate except for any business or activity which does not involve the sale of a product that is conducted pursuant to a contract with a federal military installation or a contract for administrative services which does not involve the sale of a product requested by a local, state, or federal government.

History.

883j-3: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

279.030.
Articles of incorporation — What to contain.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

The name of the corporation that satisfies the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

;

The purpose for which it is formed;

The place, including the county, where its principal office will be located;

A reasonable description of the territory in which its operations are to be conducted;

The number of directors;

The names and post office addresses of the directors who are to manage the affairs of the corporation for the first year of its existence, or until the first meeting called to elect directors, or until the successors of the first directors are elected and have qualified;

The period limited for the duration of the corporation, or that the corporation is to be perpetual;

If the corporation is organized without capital stock, the terms upon which members may be admitted and the terms upon which their membership shall terminate;

If the corporation is organized with capital stock, the amount of the stock, the number of shares into which it is divided and the par value; and

If the capital stock is divided into common and preferred stock, as it may be, the number of shares to which preference is granted and the number of shares to which no preference is granted, and the nature and definite extent of the preference and privileges granted to each.

The articles of incorporation may contain any other lawful provision that the incorporators choose to insert for the purpose of regulating the business and affairs of the corporation, for the purpose of creating, defining, limiting or regulating the rights, powers and duties of the corporation and its board of directors and members, and the exercise of any such powers, or for the purpose of creating or defining the rights and privileges of the members of the corporation among themselves, including separation of members into classes or districts and providing for representation of each class or district on the board of directors.

History.

883j-4: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 11, § 1, effective June 16, 1972; 1974, ch. 38, § 2, effective June 21, 1974; 2007, ch. 137, § 132, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
132, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, §
80, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Articles of incorporation generally, KRS

271B.2-020

.

Corporate name, KRS 14A3-010,

271B.4-010

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

279.040.
Filing and approval of articles — When corporation may begin business.

The incorporators shall execute triplicate originals of the articles of incorporation that satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

, and each incorporator shall acknowledge each triplicate original before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds. They shall then file the triplicate originals, together with the certificate of acknowledgment, in the office of the Secretary of State. If the Secretary of State finds the articles to be legal and valid, he shall immediately indorse his approval on each of the triplicate originals, retain, record and file one (1) triplicate original in his office, and deliver the other two (2) triplicate originals, with his approval indorsed thereon, to the incorporators. The incorporators shall then file one (1) approved triplicate original in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the principal office of the corporation is to be located.

As soon as the Secretary of State has filed the articles of incorporation, the proposed corporation shall be a body politic and corporate and may transact business in its corporate name.

History.

883j-5: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 3; 2010, ch. 151, § 81, effective January 1, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Filing and recording of articles generally, KRS

271B.1-200

to

271B.1-290

.

279.050.
Amendments to articles.

The articles of incorporation may be amended as provided in this section at any regular or special meeting of the members of the corporation duly called upon notice of the specific purpose. The amendment shall first be approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the directors and then adopted by a vote representing not less than a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws) and voting at such meeting. The president of the corporation shall make triplicate originals of the amendments so adopted, each satisfying the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

and the secretary of the corporation shall attest each triplicate original. Each triplicate original shall be acknowledged by the president and the secretary before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds, and the president shall then cause them to be filed, approved and recorded in the same manner as is provided by KRS

279.040

for original articles of incorporation, and the amendments shall take effect upon filing by the Secretary of State.

History.

883j-10: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 4; 2010, ch. 151, § 82, effective January 1, 2011.

279.060.
Use of “Rural Electric Cooperative” in name limited. [Repealed.]

279.070.
Bylaws — Adoption and contents.

The incorporators of each corporation organized under this chapter shall adopt for its management bylaws not inconsistent with the powers granted by this chapter. The written consent of a majority of the incorporators, evidenced by their signatures to the bylaws adopted, shall be necessary to the adoption of bylaws. The bylaws may be amended by a majority vote of the board of directors.

The bylaws may provide for any or all of the following matters:

The time, place and manner of calling and conducting meetings of the members.

The number of members constituting a quorum.

The right of members to vote by proxy or by mail, or both, and the conditions, manner, form and effect of such votes.

The number of directors constituting a quorum.

The qualifications, compensation, powers, duties and term of office of directors and officers, the time of their election and the manner of giving notice thereof.

An executive committee and the allotment to that committee of any or all of the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

The amount of entrance, organization and membership fees, if any, the manner of collecting them and the purposes for which they may be used.

The qualifications of members of the corporation and the conditions precedent to membership; the time and manner of permitting members to withdraw; the manner of assignment or transfer of the interest of a member; the conditions upon which and the time when membership of any member shall cease; the suspension of the rights of a member when he ceases to be eligible to membership in the corporation; the manner and effect of the expulsion of a member; the manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the corporation upon the death or withdrawal of a member or upon his expulsion or forfeiture of membership or, at the option of the corporation, the purchase of the member’s interest at a price fixed by appraisal by the board. The bylaws may provide that in case of the forced withdrawal or expulsion of a member the board shall equitably appraise his property interest in the corporation and shall at its option fix the amount thereof in money or other property, which shall be paid to him within one (1) year after his expulsion or withdrawal.

Penalties for violation of the bylaws.

Any other matter relating to the operation or management of the corporation and not inconsistent with law or with the articles of incorporation.

History.

883j-11.

279.080.
Board of directors and officers.

Each corporation formed under this chapter shall have a board of directors of not less than five (5) members, which shall be the governing body of the corporation. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, directors need not be members of the corporation. The directors, other than those named in the articles of incorporation, shall be elected annually or as provided for in the bylaws, but no director shall be elected for a longer term than four (4) years. The directors shall be elected in a manner to insure secrecy and anonymity of ballots cast, provided the result of such election is determined by ballot vote. The directors shall receive such compensation and reimbursement of expenses as the bylaws provide. When a vacancy on the board of directors occurs other than by expiration of a term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term by appointment, unless the bylaws otherwise provide.

Subject to the provisions of the articles of incorporation and the bylaws, the board of directors may adopt rules and regulations governing the procedure of the board and the operations of the corporation, and shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of the corporation.

The officers of a corporation shall consist of a president, a secretary, and a treasurer, each of whom shall be elected by the board of directors at such time and in such manner as may be prescribed by the bylaws. Such other officers and assistant officers and agents as may be deemed necessary may be elected or appointed by the board of directors or chosen in such other manner as may be prescribed by the bylaws. Any two (2) or more offices may be held by the same person, except that the offices of the president and secretary may not be held by the same person. All officers and agents of the corporation, as between themselves and the corporation, shall have such authority and perform such duties in the management of the corporation as may be provided in the bylaws, or as may be determined by resolution of the board of directors not inconsistent with the bylaws.

Every officer, employee, or agent handling funds, securities, or negotiable instruments of or for any corporation created under this chapter shall be required to execute an adequate bond for the faithful performance of his duties in an amount and with security approved by the board.

History.

883j-12 to 883j-14: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 6; 1982, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 130, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since a rural electric cooperative is a Kentucky nonprofit corporation and not a part of the federal government or of the federal rural electrification administration, a manager thereof is not disqualified from holding elective office under § 237 of the Kentucky Constitution.

OAG 73-412

.

In view of this section and KRS

279.050

,

279.170

and

279.180

, it is not legally permissible to change the title and duties of the president, vice-president and manager of an electric cooperative to that of chairman, vice chairman and president, respectively.

OAG 75-485

; 75-529.

There is no constitutional or statutory incompatibility involved where a person serves, at the same time, as county judge/executive and manager of a rural electric cooperative corporation; however, to avoid a conflict of interest problem and a common law incompatibility, the person holding both positions would have to demonstrate that his employment as manager of an RECC does not prevent him from performing the functions of the office of county judge/executive with the necessary care and ability and impartiality and honesty.

OAG 80-134

.

No conflict of interest under KRS 160.180(2) would be created by a local school board member being elected to the board of directors of a rural electric cooperative. However, as a practical matter the individual in issue, while sitting on the board of directors of the rural electric cooperative, should refrain from deliberations and discussions on matters, if any, that focus uniquely on the school district as contrasted to those matters affecting everyone dealing with the cooperative.

OAG 82-375

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Election of directors of private corporations, KRS

271B.8-030

,

271B.8-040

.

279.090.
Requirements for membership in corporation — Rights and liabilities of members.

No person may become or remain a member of any corporation formed under this chapter with capital stock except a farmer, a person engaged in the production of agricultural products or livestock, a cooperative association as defined in the Farm Credit Act, or a corporation organized under this chapter.

No person other than the original incorporators may become or remain a member of any corporation formed under this chapter without capital stock unless, in addition to complying with all membership requirements in the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation, such person uses electric energy supplied by the corporation or by a corporation that is a member of the corporation in question, or such person is a corporation formed under this chapter or is a corporation furnishing electric energy or is a cooperative association as defined in the Farm Credit Act.

Any corporation formed under this chapter without capital stock may provide in its articles of incorporation that, in addition to the requirements for membership set forth in subsection (2) of this section, no person other than the original incorporators may become or remain a member unless that person is a farmer or is a cooperative association within the meaning of the Farm Credit Act, or that a stated percentage of its members must be and remain farmers or cooperative associations within the meaning of the Farm Credit Act.

Any corporation formed under this chapter may become a member of any other corporation formed under this chapter and may fully avail itself of the facilities and services of that corporation.

Each member of a corporation organized under this chapter with or without capital stock shall have only one (1) vote, and memberships shall not be transferable.

Neither the incorporators nor any member of any corporation formed under this chapter shall be personally responsible for any debt, obligation or liability of the corporation, except for promissory notes given for the purchase of common stock in the corporation or except as the incorporator or member may become personally liable by reason of his or her own acts or conduct.

History.

883j-4, 883j-8, 883j-15, 883j-16: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 7; 2010, ch. 133, § 47, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Liability of shareholders of ordinary private corporation, KRS

271B.6-220

.

279.095.
Nonprofit operation.

A rural electric cooperative shall be operated on a nonprofit basis for the mutual benefit of its members and patrons. The bylaws of a cooperative or its contracts with members and patrons shall contain such provisions relative to the disposition of revenue and receipts as may be necessary and appropriate to establish and maintain its nonprofit and cooperative character. In the case of a cooperative authorized to issue shares of stock, such bylaws or contracts shall provide that no moneys shall be paid or credits given on the basis of patronage except after the declaration or payment of dividends on the outstanding shares of stock in accordance with the articles of incorporation of the cooperative, and such bylaws or contracts shall otherwise be consistent with the cooperative’s obligations in respect of such shares of stock.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 11, § 2.

279.100.
Common and preferred stock — Ownership and transfer.

Only a member of a corporation organized under this chapter may own its common stock, and neither the common stock in any such corporation nor any interest therein shall be transferable or assignable, either by act of the parties or by operation of law, to any person who is not eligible to be a member of the corporation.

No corporation formed under this chapter shall issue common stock to a member until it has been fully paid for, but the promissory notes of a member may be accepted by the corporation as full or partial payment. The corporation shall hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but such retention as security shall not affect the member’s right to vote.

No person, other than a corporation formed under this chapter, shall at any one time own more than five percent (5%) of the outstanding common stock of any corporation formed under this chapter.

Any such corporation may at any time, as specified in its bylaws, except when the debts of the corporation exceed fifty percent (50%) of its assets, buy in or purchase its common stock at the book value thereof, as conclusively determined by its board of directors, and pay for it in cash within one (1) year thereafter.

Preferred stock may be owned by and transferred to any person, and may be made redeemable and retirable by the corporation on such terms and conditions as are provided for in the articles of incorporation and printed on the face of each certificate. Ownership of preferred stock shall not confer on the holder any right to vote.

History.

883j-8: amend. Acts 1986, ch. 111, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Acquisition of own shares by ordinary corporation, KRS

271B.6-310

.

Classes of stock that corporation may issue, KRS

271B.6-020

.

279.110.
General powers of rural electric cooperative corporations.

Any corporation created under this chapter may:

Acquire and hold any property necessary or incidental to the proper conduct of its business, including preferred stock and common stock or other corporations whether formed under this chapter or not, and the stock of any federal agency, and may pay for any such property in cash, property or on credit, or both, and secure and procure payment of all or any part of the purchase price thereof on such terms and conditions as its board of directors determines;

Acquire, own, operate, maintain and improve one (1) or more systems;

Pledge all or part of its revenue or mortgage or encumber all or any part of its property for the purpose of securing the payment of the principal and interest of any of its obligations;

Have and exercise the right of eminent domain in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky;

Construct, own, lease, operate, and control any facilities across, along, or under any street or public highway, and over any lands belonging to this state or to any county, city, or political subdivision of this state, but shall restore any such street or highway to its former condition as nearly as possible and shall not use it in such a manner as to impair unnecessarily its usefulness;

Accept gifts and grants of money or property from this state, any county, city, or political subdivision of this state, any federal agency, or any other person, and accept voluntary and uncompensated services;

Make any contract necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted by this chapter, or for any other corporate purpose, subject to any limitations imposed by this chapter;

Sell, lease, or dispose of all or any part of its property, subject to the provisions of KRS

279.140

;

Contract debts, borrow money without limitation as to the amount of corporate indebtedness or liability, and issue or assume obligations;

Fix and collect reasonable rates and charges for services, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 278;

Assist its members in wiring their premises for the use of electric energy and in purchasing electrical equipment, appliances, and supplies, and in financing such activities;

Establish affiliates to engage in nonregulated businesses or activities as provided for in KRS

279.020

.

A cooperative formed under this chapter shall annually report to its member-owners the nature of the nonregulated business or activity, its financial status and future expectations, as well as any other information deemed appropriate by its board of directors. The cooperative shall file with the Public Service Commission a balance sheet and income statement for each nonregulated business or activity, if the cooperative has established a separate affiliate to engage in nonregulated business or activity.

If the cooperative’s nonregulated activities are conducted within the cooperative pursuant to a contract with a federal military installation or a local, state, or federal government as provided for in KRS

279.020

, a balance sheet and statement of revenues and expenses for each nonregulated business or activity shall be filed with the Public Service Commission.

The information to be filed with the Public Service Commission shall be filed simultaneously with the Public Service Commission annual report. The cooperative may request confidentiality for any information it provides as required in this subsection that it deems proprietary or competitive; and

Do anything not specifically set forth in this section that is reasonably deemed necessary, proper, or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of the corporation and is not prohibited by law.

History.

883j-7, 883j-8: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 68; 1972, ch. 11, § 3; 1976, ch. 140, § 114; 2006, ch. 114, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

279.120.
Persons with whom corporation may do business — Conditions for acquisition of new base load generating facility.

Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, corporations formed under this chapter shall supply electric energy, furnish services, and sell personal property, except that transferred in part payment for other personal property, to their members only.

Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section and in KRS

279.125

, any corporation formed under this chapter may supply electric energy, furnish services and sell property, to the extent of not more than forty-nine percent (49%) of its total business, to nonmembers of the corporation, including any federal agency, any state, and any county, city or political subdivision.

A corporation formed under this chapter may sell and lease back any part or all of its property free of the restrictions contained in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, or any other section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes except that such sale shall be subject to KRS

279.140

.

A corporation formed under this chapter on or before December 31, 2005, may supply electric energy to a nonmember of the corporation free of the restrictions contained in subsections (1) and (2) of this section only if:

The hourly amount of electric energy supplied is produced by a generator owned or leased by the corporation; and

The hourly amount of electric energy supplied was previously used by a member of the corporation, which is also a corporation formed under this chapter on or before December 31, 2005, to provide electric service to a retail customer with an annual hourly peak electric energy requirement of more than two hundred (200) megawatts.

A sale of electric energy authorized by subsection (4) of this section shall be considered member business for purposes of subsection (2) of this section.

A corporation formed under this chapter that is supplying electric energy to a nonmember of the corporation under subsections (4) and (5) of this section may acquire a new base load generating facility for its system by purchase, lease, or construction only if, at the time the corporation enters into a binding commitment for the acquisition of the new base load generating facility, the number of megawatts the corporation is supplying to nonmembers of the corporation is forty-nine percent (49%) or less of the total number of megawatts that the corporation is supplying to all persons.

History.

883j-8, 883j-16: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 9; 1984, ch. 27, § 1, effective February 23, 1984; 2004, ch. 12, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 4, § 1, effective July 21, 2006.

279.125.
Transmission, distribution or sale of energy to municipally owned electric utility — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, unless specific authorization is granted by the Public Service Commission, no corporation formed under this chapter shall transmit, distribute or furnish electric energy for resale, either directly or indirectly, to any electric utility now or hereafter owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by any municipality or municipalities, or instrumentalities thereof, incorporated on June 21, 1974, except to any such electric utility to which such corporation’s electric facilities are physically connected on June 21, 1974; and provided, further, that no provision herein shall prevent a corporation organized under this chapter from interconnecting for exchanges of energy with any such municipal utility which, on June 21, 1974, owns and operates electric generating facilities adequate to supply the electric requirements of the municipality. The required authorization as used in this section shall not be construed to extend the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission over municipally owned electric systems.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 10; 2004, ch. 12, § 2, effective July 13, 2004.

279.130.
Obligations, how issued, secured, purchased or redeemed.

Any corporation formed under this chapter may issue its obligations and pledge its future revenues for the payment thereof. The obligations may be in the form of bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates or other evidences of indebtedness. The obligations shall be authorized by the board of directors by a resolution which shall fix the dates of issuance and maturity, the rate and time of payment of interest, and denominations, the form (either coupon or registered), the registration privileges, the manner of execution, the place and medium of payment, and the terms of redemption. Any limitation as to interest or term of maturity otherwise provided by law shall not be applicable to obligations issued by a corporation organized under this chapter.

History.

883j-17, 883j-18, 883j-19: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9; 1972, ch. 11, § 4.

279.140.
Power of board of directors to encumber or dispose of property.

Except as provided in KRS

279.090

,

279.120

and

279.130

, and in subsection (2) of this section, no corporation formed under this chapter may sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any of its property unless the board of directors is authorized so to do by a majority vote of the total membership. Due notice shall be given to all members of the proposed sale, lease or other disposition of such property. The board of directors, without authorization by the members, shall have full power and authority to authorize the execution and delivery of a mortgage or mortgages or a deed or deeds of trust upon, or the pledging or encumbering of any or all of, the property, assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises, and permits of such a corporation, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated, as well as the revenues and income therefrom, upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors shall determine, to secure any obligation of such corporation, any provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of such corporation to the contrary notwithstanding.

The board may sell any of the following property without authority from the members:

Property that is not necessary in operating and maintaining the system, but sales of such property shall not in any one year exceed ten percent (10%) in value of all the property of the corporation other than merchandise and property acquired for resale;

Services and electric energy;

Property acquired for resale; and

Merchandise.

History.

883j-23: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 11, § 5.

279.150.
Other electric companies required to sell electric energy to cooperatives.

No person engaged in the business of producing, selling or distributing electric energy for public use in this state shall refuse to furnish electric energy to any corporation organized under this chapter, if the corporation is able and willing to pay the same rates for such energy as are paid by other consumers in the same territory using a comparable amount of energy. This section does not forbid a discrimination based on the load factor or diversity factor.

History.

883j-24.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Municipal electric plants not to compete, but may cooperate, with rural cooperatives, KRS

96.890

.

279.160.
Rates, charges and prices, how to be fixed — Disposition of surplus revenue. [Repealed.]

279.170.
Consolidation of cooperatives.

Any two (2) or more corporations created under this chapter may enter into an agreement for their consolidation. The agreement shall set forth the terms and conditions of the consolidation, the name of the proposed consolidated corporation, the number of its directors, which shall be not less than five (5), the time of the annual meetings of the consolidated corporation and the names of the directors who are to serve until the first annual meeting. If the agreement is approved by a majority vote of those members voting at each corporation, with the votes cast as authorized by KRS

279.070

, the directors named in the agreement shall subscribe and acknowledge articles in triplicate originals conforming substantially to the original articles of incorporation, and entitled and indorsed “Articles of Consolidation of . . . . . ”

The articles of consolidation shall state:

The names of the corporations being consolidated.

The name of the consolidated corporation.

Such other items as are required or permitted to be set forth in the original articles of incorporation.

The articles of consolidation shall be filed, recorded and approved in the same manner, and shall take effect upon approval, as is provided in KRS

279.040

for original articles of incorporation.

The articles of consolidation may be amended in the same manner as articles of incorporation may be amended under KRS

279.050

.

History.

883j-21: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 38, § 8; 1998, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

279.180.
Dissolution.

Any corporation formed under this chapter may be dissolved by filing articles of dissolution, which shall be entitled and indorsed “Articles of Dissolution of . . . . . ” and shall state:

The name of the corporation and, if it is a consolidated corporation, the names of the original corporations;

The date of filing of the articles of incorporation and, if the corporation is a consolidated corporation, the dates on which the articles of incorporation of the original corporations were filed;

That the corporation elects to dissolve; and

The name and post office address of each of its directors, and the name, title and post office address of each of its officers.

The articles of dissolution shall be subscribed and acknowledged in the same manner as original articles of incorporation, by the president or a vice president and the secretary or an assistant secretary, who shall make and attach an affidavit stating that they have been authorized to execute and file the articles by a majority vote of all of the members.

Articles of dissolution shall be filed, recorded and approved in the same manner, and shall take effect upon approval, as is provided in KRS

279.040

for articles of incorporation.

The corporation filing articles of dissolution shall continue in existence for the purpose of paying, satisfying and discharging any existing liabilities or obligations and collecting or liquidating its assets, and doing all other acts required to adjust and wind up its business and affairs and may sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with in its corporate name. Any assets remaining after the liabilities and obligations of the corporation have been satisfied or discharged shall be ratably distributed to the members of the corporation.

History.

883j-22: amend. Acts 1986, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

279.190.
Fees for articles and amendments — No recording taxes.

For acting upon, filing and recording articles of incorporation, articles of consolidation, articles of dissolution, or amendments to articles of incorporation or consolidation, the corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State a sum not to exceed two dollars ($2) for which the Secretary of State shall give his receipt.

For filing and recording articles of incorporation, articles of consolidation, articles of dissolution, or amendments to articles of incorporation or consolidation, the corporation shall pay to the county clerk a sum not to exceed three dollars ($3), for which the county clerk shall give his receipt.

No fee shall be paid or received for affixing the state seal to any of the documents mentioned in this section or to any copy thereof.

The recordation of the documents mentioned in this section shall be exempt from all recording taxes.

History.

883j-30.

279.200.
Taxes.

Corporations formed under this chapter shall be exempt from all profit taxes, gross and net taxes, sales taxes, occupation taxes, privilege taxes, income taxes, taxes on electric current consumed and from all excise taxes whatsoever, any statute now existing or hereafter passed to the contrary notwithstanding. In lieu of all other state, county, city and district taxes, except ad valorem and franchise taxes, corporations formed under this chapter shall pay to the State Treasurer an annual tax of ten dollars ($10).

History.

883j-28: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 173, § 19.

279.210.
Jurisdiction of Public Service Commission — Application of other laws.

Every corporation formed under KRS

279.010

to

279.220

shall be subject to the general supervision of the Public Service Commission, and shall be subject to all the provisions of KRS

278.010

to

278.450

inclusive, and KRS

278.990

.

The provisions of the general corporation laws of this state and all rights and powers thereunder shall apply to corporations organized under KRS

279.010

to

279.220

, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of KRS

279.010

to

279.220

.

History.

883j-25, 883j-27: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 129.